Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.210

School locker searches—Findings.

The legislature finds that illegal drug activity and weapons in schools threaten the safety and welfare of school children and pose a severe threat to the state educational system. School officials need authority to maintain order and discipline in schools and to protect students from exposure to illegal drugs, weapons, and contraband. Searches of school-issued lockers and the contents of those lockers is a reasonable and necessary tool to protect the interests of the students of the state as a whole.

[ 1989 c 271 s 244. Formerly RCW 28A.67.300.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 271: See note following RCW 9.94A.510.